Illinois, session 104th, SB909.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 1-2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/1-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1-2)7    Sec. 1-2. General purposes. The The provisions of this 8Code shall be construed in accordance with the general 9purposes hereof, to:10    (a) Forbid and prevent the commission of offenses;11    (b) Define adequately the act and mental state which 12constitute each offense, and limit the condemnation of conduct 13as criminal when it is without fault;14    (c) Prescribe penalties which are proportionate to the 15seriousness of offenses and which permit recognition of 16differences in rehabilitation possibilities among individual 17offenders;18    (d) Prevent arbitrary or oppressive treatment of persons 19accused or convicted of offenses.20(Source: Laws 1961, p. 1983.)